District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

10-1016

Establishment of District of Columbia Employee Parking Program Fund.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 1806k
as added Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 1005, 55 DCR 7598
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 244(a), 56 DCR 1117
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 1251, 57 DCR 181
Mar. 11, 2010, D.C. Law 18-115, § 3(a), 57 DCR 886
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21,§§ 1032(a), 9018, 58 DCR 6226

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1061 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-187, August 26, 2009, 56 DCR 7374).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1251 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1251 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 1012(a) of Fiscal Year 2012 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-93, June 29, 2011, 58 DCR 5599).

Short Title

Short title: Section 1004 of D.C. Law 17-219 provided that subtitle B of title I of the act may be cited as the “District of Columbia Employee Parking Program Fund Establishment Amendment Act of 2008”.

Short title: Section 1250 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle Z of title I of the act may be cited as the “Employee-Parking Program Fund Amendment Act of 2009”.